New York, session 2025-2026, S9843.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "the construction reporting pay act". 3 § 2. Legislative intent and findings. The legislature finds that 4 employees in construction are entitled to the same scheduling, reliabil- 5 ity, and predictability as other fields of employment. The legislature 6 further finds that reliable and predictable scheduling will create a 7 more harmonious relationship between labor and management, leading to an 8 overall better and safer working environment. 9 § 3. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 224-g to read as 10 follows: 11 § 224-g. Wage requirements for reporting and scheduling pay. 1. 12 Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, for any 13 construction projects covered by sections two hundred twenty, two 14 hundred twenty-b, two hundred twenty four-a, two hundred twenty four-d, 15 two hundred twenty four-e, two hundred twenty four-f as added by section 16 three of part TT of chapter fifty-six of the laws of two thousand twen- 17 ty-three, or two hundred twenty four-f as added by chapter two hundred 18 seventy-eight of the laws of two thousand twenty-three, each laborer, 19 worker or mechanic in the employ of a contractor who by request or 20 permission of an employer reports for work on any day shall be paid no 21 less than four hours at the prevailing rate of wages, including supple- 22 ments, as defined in this article for the employee's regularly scheduled 23 classification of work, however, this section shall not be applicable if 24 the posted prevailing rate of wages provides for reporting pay wages or 25 benefits greater than set forth in this section. Payments owed to an 26 employee pursuant to this section shall be deemed prevailing rate of 27 wages or supplements as defined in this article. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09757-01-5 S. 9843 2 1 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each 2 laborer, worker or mechanic in the employ of a contractor who by request 3 or permission of an employer is scheduled to report for work on any day 4 shall be paid for two hours at the prevailing rate of wages, including 5 supplements, as defined in this article for the regularly scheduled 6 classification of work when such scheduled shift is cancelled on less 7 than twelve hours' notice to the employee. 8 § 4. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 196-e to read as 9 follows: 10 § 196-e. Construction industry reporting pay provisions. 1. Notwith- 11 standing any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, an employee 12 engaged in construction, as defined in subdivision one of section eight 13 hundred sixty-one-b of this chapter, who by request or permission of an 14 employer reports for work on any day shall be paid for at least four 15 hours, or the number of hours in the regularly scheduled shift, whichev- 16 er is less, at the employee's promised hourly wage. 17 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, an 18 employee engaged in construction, as defined in subdivision one of 19 section eight hundred sixty-one-b of this chapter, who by request or 20 permission of an employer is scheduled to report for work on any day 21 shall be paid for two hours at the employee's promised hourly wage when 22 such scheduled shift is cancelled on less than twelve hours' notice to 23 the employee. Payments owed to an employee pursuant to this section 24 shall be deemed wages as defined in this article. 25 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 27 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 28 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 29 on or before such effective date.